California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 for the purposes of providing comprehensive health insurance coverage to children whose coverage is not eligible for funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa, et seq.), or to a combination of children whose coverage is eligible for funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act and children whose coverage is not eligible for that funding. To be approved by the department, these proposals shall comply with both of the following requirements:

(1) Meet all applicable requirements for funding under this chapter, except for availability of funding through Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

(2) Provide for the administration of children’s coverage by the department through the administrative infrastructure serving the Medi-Cal program, and through health care service plans serving the Medi-Cal program.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the status of any application previously submitted to, and approved by, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board pursuant to former Part 6.4 (commencing with Section 12699.50) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code shall not be altered as a result of the assumption by the department, pursuant to this chapter, of the responsibilities previously exercised by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(h) If at any time the director determines that the eligibility criteria established for the program described in this section may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial
 participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), any amendment or extension of that act, or any similar federal legislation affecting federal financial participation, the director may alter the eligibility criteria to the extent necessary for the state to receive that federal financial participation.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12693.25) and Chapter 9 (commencing with 12693.70) of Part 6.2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, through all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(j) For any child found eligible under this section, they shall remain continuously
 eligible until they are five years of age. A redetermination of eligibility shall not be conducted before the child reaches five years of age unless the department or county possesses facts indicating that the family has requested the child’s voluntary disenrollment, the child is deceased, the child is no longer a state resident, or the child’s original enrollment was based on a state or county error or on fraud, abuse, or perjury attributed to the child or the child’s representative.

(k) (1) Implementation of this section is contingent on all of the following conditions:

(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (f).

(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund
 resources are available to support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(C) The department has determined that systems have been programmed to implement this section.

(2) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in paragraph (1) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(l) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2025,
 or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (k), whichever is later.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2026, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 80.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2025, or later, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15854.

(a) The department, in consultation with other appropriate parties, shall establish the criteria for evaluating an applicant’s proposal, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The extent to which the program described in the proposal provides comprehensive coverage, including health, dental, and vision benefits.

(2) Whether the proposal includes a promotional component to notify the public of its provision of health insurance to eligible children.

(3) The simplicity of the proposal’s procedures for applying to participate and for determining eligibility for participation in its program.

(4) The extent to which the proposal provides for coordination and conformity with benefits provided through the Medi-Cal program.

(5) The extent to which the proposal provides for coordination and conformity with existing Medi-Cal administrative entities in order to prevent administrative duplication and fragmentation.

(6) The ability of the health care providers designated in the proposal to serve the eligible population and the extent to which the proposal includes traditional and safety net providers, as defined by the department.

(7) The extent to which the proposal intends to work with the school districts and county offices of education.

(8) The total amount of funds available to the
 applicant to implement the program described in its proposal, and the percentage of this amount proposed for administrative costs as well as the cost to the state to administer the proposal.

(9) The extent to which the proposal seeks to minimize the substitution of private employer health insurance coverage for health benefits provided through a governmental source.

(10) The extent to which local resources may be available after the depletion of federal funds to continue any current program expansions for persons covered under local health care financing programs or for expanded benefits.

(11) For the purposes of defining an applicant’s eligibility for funding under this chapter, the following shall apply:

(A) The same income methodology shall be used
 for the proposed program that is currently used for the Medi-Cal program.

(B) Only participating Medi-Cal managed care plans may be used. However, the department may permit exceptions to this requirement consistent with the purpose, of this chapter.

(b) The department may, in its sole discretion, approve or disapprove projects for funding pursuant to this chapter on an annual basis.

(c) To the extent that an applicant’s proposal pursuant to this chapter provides for health plan or administrative services under a contract entered into by the department or at rates negotiated for the applicant by the department, a contract entered into by the department or by an applicant shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the
 Department of General Services to the same extent as contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 14005.26. The department and the applicant shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract, but may allocate funds to each contract based on the projected or actual subscriber enrollments to a total amount not to exceed the amount appropriated for the project, including family contributions, when applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 141.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15854.5.

(a) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, and notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose subscriber contributions for purposes of coverage as described in this chapter for an applicable coverage period.

(b) If the department elects to not impose subscriber contributions for an applicable coverage period pursuant to subdivision (a) or elects to reinstate such subscriber contributions for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 142.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15855.

The department shall review each funding proposal submitted by an applicant in accordance with the criteria described in Section 15854 and based on that criteria, approve or reject the proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15856.

(a) Upon its approval of a proposal that shall include any allowable amount of federal funds under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.), the department may provide the applicant reimbursement in an amount equal to the amount that the applicant will contribute to implement the program described in its proposal, plus the appropriate and allowable amount of federal funds. Not more than 10 percent of the County Health Initiative Matching Fund and matching federal funds shall be expended in any one fiscal year for administrative costs, including the costs to the state to administer the proposal, unless the department permits the expenditure consistent with the availability of federal matching funds not needed for the purposes described in
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 15862, or unless the department determines that an expenditure for administrative costs has no impact on available federal funding. The department may audit the expenses incurred by the applicant in implementing its program to ensure that the expenditures comply with the provisions of this chapter. No reimbursement may be made to an applicant that fails to meet its financial participation obligation under this chapter. The state’s reasonable startup costs and ongoing costs for administering the program shall be reimbursed by those entities applying for funding.

(b) Any program approved pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 15853 that requires any funding not allowable for a federal match under Title XXI of the Social Security Act shall provide the department with the total amount of funds needed to provide that portion of coverage not eligible for federal matching funds, including reasonable startup
 costs and ongoing costs for administering the program.

(c) Each applicant that is provided funds under this chapter shall submit to the department a plan to limit initial and continuing enrollment in its program in the event the amount of moneys for its program is insufficient to maintain health insurance coverage for those participating in the program.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the state shall be held harmless, in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3), from any federal audit disallowance and interest resulting from payments made to a participating applicant pursuant to this section, for the disallowed claim.

(2) To the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which any participating applicant has received
 reimbursement for services rendered or other activities performed, the department shall recoup from the participating applicant that submitted the disallowed claim, through offsets or by a direct billing, amounts equal to the amount of the disallowance and interest for the disallowed claim. All subsequent claims submitted to the department applicable to any previously disallowed service, activity, or claim may be held in abeyance, with no payment made, until the federal disallowance issue is resolved.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), to the extent that a federal audit disallowance and interest results from a claim or claims for which the participating applicant has received reimbursement for services rendered or activities performed by an entity under contract with, and on behalf of, the participating applicant, the department shall be held harmless by that particular participating applicant for 100 percent of the amount of the federal audit
 disallowance and interest for the disallowed claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15857.

Each health care service plan, specialized health care service plan, and health insurer that contracts to provide health care benefits under this chapter shall be licensed by the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, or be a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15858.

(a) The department shall administer the provisions of this chapter and may do all of the following:

(1) Administer the expenditure of moneys from the fund.

(2) (A) Issue rules and regulations as necessary.

(B) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters, plan letters,
 plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(3) Enter into contracts.

(4) Exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15859.

All expenses incurred by the department in administering this chapter, including, but not limited to, expenses for developing standards and processes to implement any of the provisions of this chapter, evaluating applications, or processing or granting appeals growing out of any of the provisions of this chapter, shall be paid from the fund or directly by applicants, except that the department may accept funding from a not-for-profit group or foundation, or from a governmental entity providing grants for health-related activities, to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15860.

Nothing in this chapter creates a right or an entitlement to the provision of health insurance coverage or health care benefits. Except as provided in Section 15850.5, no costs shall accrue to the state for the provision of these services. The state shall not be liable beyond the assets of the fund for any obligation incurred or liabilities sustained by applicants in the operation of the fund or of the projects authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15861.

To the extent necessary to obtain federal financial participation for projects approved pursuant to this chapter, the department shall apply for one or more waivers or shall file state plan amendments pursuant to the federal State Children’s Health Insurance Program (Subchapter 21 (commencing with Section 1397aa) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code) to allow a county agency, local initiative, or county organized health system to apply for matching funds through the federal State Children’s Health Insurance Program (Subchapter 21 (commencing with Section 1397aa) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code) using local funds for the state matching funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15862.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall be implemented only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Federal financial participation is available for this purpose.

(2) Federal participation is approved.

(3) The department determines that federal funds under Title XXI of the Social Security Act remain available after providing funds for all current enrollees and eligible children that are likely to enroll in the optional targeted low-income children group and, to the extent funded through the federal Children’s Health Insurance Program (Subchapter 21 (commencing with Section 1397aa) of
 Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code), the Medi-Cal Access program and Medi-Cal program, as determined by a Department of Finance estimate.

(4) Funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose.

(b) The department may accept funding necessary for the preparation of the federal waiver applications or state plan amendments described in Section 15861 from a not-for-profit group or foundation, but only to the extent that the funding may be eligible for federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 625.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15863.

The state shall be held harmless for any federal disallowance resulting from this chapter and any other expenses or liabilities, including, but not limited to, the cost of processing or granting appeals, unless the department is acting pursuant to Section 15850.5. An applicant receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for any reduced federal financial participation, and any other expenses or liabilities, including, but not limited to, the costs of processing or granting appeals, resulting from the implementation of this chapter with respect to that applicant. The state may recoup any federal disallowance from the applicant for which it can be held harmless.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15864.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 2014) for Chapter 3, commencing with Section 15850.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program [15870. - 15895.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [15870. - 15872.5.]

15870.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Applicant” means an individual who applies for major risk medical coverage through the program.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(d) “Fund” means the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund, from which the department may authorize expenditures to pay for medically necessary services which
 exceed subscribers’ contributions, and for administration of the program.

(e) “Major risk medical coverage” means the payment for medically necessary services provided by institutional and professional providers.

(f) “Participating health plan” means either of the following entities that contracts with the department to administer major risk medical coverage to program subscribers:

(1) A private insurer holding a valid outstanding certificate of authority from the Insurance Commissioner.

(2) A health care service plan as defined under subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Plan rates” means the total monthly amount charged by a participating health plan for a
 category of risk.

(h) “Program” means the California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program.

(i) “Subscriber” means an individual who is eligible for and receives major risk medical coverage through the program, and includes a member of a federally recognized California Indian tribe.

(j) “Subscriber contribution” means the portion of participating health plan rates paid by the subscriber, or paid on behalf of the subscriber by a federally recognized California Indian tribal government. If a federally recognized California Indian tribal government makes a contribution on behalf of a member of the tribe, the tribal government shall ensure that the subscriber is made aware of all the health plan options available in the county where the member resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15872.

The California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program is hereby established within, and shall be administered by, the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15872.5.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 2014) for Chapter 4, comprising Sections 15870 to 15895.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [15873. - 15877.]

15873.

The department shall have the authority:

(a) To establish eligibility criteria, notwithstanding Section 15884, and determine the eligibility of applicants.

(b) To determine the major risk medical coverage to be provided to program subscribers.

(c) To research and assess the needs of persons not adequately covered by existing private and public health care delivery systems and promote means of assuring the availability of adequate health care services.

(d) To approve subscriber contributions, and plan rates, and establish program
 contribution amounts.

(e) To provide major risk medical coverage for subscribers or to contract with a participating health plan or plans or other vendor to provide or administer major risk medical coverage for subscribers.

(f) To authorize expenditures from the fund to pay program expenses which exceed subscriber contributions.

(g) To contract for administration of the program or any portion thereof with any public agency, including any agency of state government, or with any private entity.

(h) (1) To issue rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title
 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(i) To authorize expenditures from the fund or from other moneys appropriated in the annual Budget Act for purposes relating to Section 10127.16
 of the Insurance Code, and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) To exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed upon it under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15876.

Plan rates for major risk medical benefits approved for the program shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory, but shall be adequate to pay anticipated costs of claims or services and administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15877.

(a) The department shall direct the participating health plans to inform all program subscribers of the December 31, 2024, transition of coverage as follows:

(1) (A) On August 1, 2024, the participating health plans shall send an initial notification to all program subscribers. The initial notice will inform subscribers of all of the following:

(i) That a plan-based enroller shall assist the subscriber in applying to Medi-Cal or through the California Health Benefit Exchange for other health care coverage.

(ii) That assistance may be available through the California Health Benefit Exchange or
 clinic navigators and how to obtain that assistance.

(iii) Information regarding where and how subscribers can apply to the California Health Benefit Exchange for alternate health care coverage.

(B) If a participating health plan has plan-based enrollers through the California Health Benefit Exchange, the plan shall direct the plan-based enrollers to assist the subscribers in understanding their coverage options.

(C) Assistance to subscribers by plans shall provide information on continuity with an existing provider to the extent possible.

(2) On October 1, 2024, the participating health plans shall send a second notification informing all program subscribers that coverage shall transition on December 31, 2024, for those who are eligible for other
 coverage, and the notice shall include all of the information that was included in the initial notification sent on August 1, 2024.

(3) On December 1, 2024, the participating health plans shall send a third notification informing all program subscribers that coverage shall transition on December 31, 2024, for those who are eligible for other coverage, and the notice shall include all of the information that was included in the initial notification sent on August 1, 2024.

(b) (1) Upon request from the California Health Benefit Exchange, the department may disclose information to the Exchange to assist program subscribers to transition into new coverage pursuant to this section.

(2) The Exchange may disclose information obtained from the department to outreach and marketing vendors under contract
 to the Exchange.

(3) The Exchange shall not disclose information obtained from the department to a certified insurance agent, a certified enrollment counselor, or any other entity without the consent of the applicant, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(4) Any outreach and marketing conducted pursuant to this section shall include, in a conspicuous and easy-to-access manner, the ability for individuals to decline all future outreach and marketing.

(5) The Exchange shall take all necessary measures to safeguard the confidentiality of any information obtained from the department and shall at no time use or disclose that information for any purpose other than to market and publicize the availability of health care coverage through the Exchange to individuals whose information the Exchange receives pursuant to
 subdivision (c). The Exchange shall at all times only request, use, or disclose the minimum amount of information necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it was obtained.

(6) A person or entity that receives information from the Exchange pursuant to this section shall take all necessary measures to safeguard the confidentiality of any information obtained from the Exchange and shall at no time use or disclose that information for any purpose other than to market and publicize the availability of health care coverage through the Exchange to individuals, as directed by the Exchange. A person or entity shall at all times only request from the Exchange, use, or disclose the minimum amount of information necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it was received.

(7) Information received by the Exchange from the department shall both:

(A) At all times be subject to applicable privacy and information security-related requirements arising under both federal and state law.

(B) Be destroyed in a manner that maintains confidentiality.

(8) The Exchange shall ensure that information disclosed to outreach and marketing vendors or any other entity pursuant to this section complies with paragraph (7).

(c) Sections 1373.65, 1373.95, and 1373.96 of the Health Safety Code shall apply, whether or not the plan is licensed under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The department shall cease to provide coverage through the program on December 31, 2024, and on that date shall cease to
 operate the program except as necessary to comply with subdivision (e).

(e) The department shall complete payments to, or payment reconciliations with, participating health plans or other contractors, process appeals, and conduct other necessary termination activities.

(f) Commencing November 1, 2024, and ending when the transition of coverage is complete, the department shall provide monthly updates to the Assembly Committees on Health and Budget and the Senate Committees on Health and Budget and Fiscal Review on the status of the transition of subscribers to other coverage. These updates shall include the number of subscribers who have transitioned and, to the extent available, to where, the number remaining in the program, and any available demographic information of each subscriber.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 81.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Policies Issued by the Department [15878. - 15880.]

15878.

The department may place a lien on compensation or benefits recovered or recoverable by a subscriber from any party or parties responsible for the compensation or benefits for which benefits have been provided under a policy issued under this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 15881).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15879.

Except as provided in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 14124.70) of Chapter 7 of Part 3, benefits received under this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 15881) are in excess of and secondary to, any other form of health benefits coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15880.

Benefits under this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 15881) shall be subject to required subscriber copayments and deductibles as the department may authorize. Any authorized copayments shall not exceed 25 percent and any authorized deductible shall not exceed an annual household deductible amount of five hundred dollars ($500). However, health plans not utilizing a deductible may be authorized to charge an office visit copayment of up to twenty-five dollars ($25). If the department contracts with participating health plans pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 15881), copayments or deductibles shall be authorized in a manner consistent with the basic method of operation of the participating health plans. The aggregate amount of deductible and copayments payable
 annually under this section shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for an individual and four thousand dollars ($4,000) for a family.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Participating Health Plans [15881. - 15883.]

15881.

The department shall provide coverage through participating health plans and may contract for the processing of applications, the enrollment of subscribers, and activities necessary to administer the program. A contract entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. The department shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract but may allocate funds to each contract based on projected and actual subscriber enrollments in a total amount not to exceed revenue available for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15882.

The department may provide or purchase stop-loss coverage under which the program and participating health plans share the risk for health plan expenses which exceed plan rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15883.

The department shall withdraw its approval of any participating health benefits plan for noncompliance with program standards, nonpayment of claims, or other good cause shown. Approval shall not be withdrawn except after reasonable notice to the health plan, program subscribers enrolled in the plan, physicians or organizations of physicians offering services through the plan, and all interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Subscriber Eligibility and Enrollment [15884. - 15888.5.]

15884.

(a) Each resident of the state meeting the eligibility criteria of this section and who is unable to secure adequate private health coverage is eligible to apply for major risk medical coverage through the program. For these purposes, “resident” includes a member of a federally recognized California Indian tribe.

(b) To be eligible for enrollment in the program, an applicant shall have been rejected for health care coverage by at least one private health plan. An applicant shall be deemed to have been rejected if the only private health coverage that the applicant could secure would do one of the following:

(1) Impose substantial
 waivers that the department determines would leave a subscriber without adequate coverage for medically necessary services.

(2) Afford limited coverage that the department determines would leave the subscriber without adequate coverage for medically necessary services.

(3) Afford coverage only at an excessive price, which the department determines is significantly above standard average individual coverage rates.

(c) Rejection for policies or certificates of specified disease or policies or certificates of hospital confinement indemnity, as described in Section 10198.61 of the Insurance Code, shall not be deemed to be rejection for the purposes of eligibility for enrollment.

(d) The department may permit dependents of eligible subscribers to enroll in
 major risk medical coverage through the program if the department determines the enrollment can be carried out in an actuarially and administratively sound manner.

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the department shall prescribe a period of time during which a resident is ineligible to apply for major risk medical coverage through the program if the resident either voluntarily disenrolls from, or was terminated for nonpayment of the premium from, a private health plan after enrolling in that private health plan pursuant to either Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15884.5.

(a) It shall constitute unfair competition for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code for an insurer, an insurance agent or broker, or an administrator, as defined in Section 1759 of the Insurance Code, to refer an individual employee, or his or her dependents, to the program, or arrange for an individual employee, or his or her dependents, to apply to the program, for the purpose of separating that employee, or his or her dependents, from group health coverage provided in connection with the employees employment.

(b) It shall constitute an unfair labor practice contrary to public policy and enforceable under Section 95 of
 the Labor Code for any employer to refer an individual employee, or his or her dependents, to the program, or to arrange for an individual employee, or his or her dependents, to apply to the program, for the purpose of separating that employee, or his or her dependents, from group health coverage provided in connection with the employee’s employment.

(c) As used in this section, “group health coverage” includes any nonprofit hospital service plan, health care service plan, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or disability insurance providing medical or hospital benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15885.
